District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.21

Penalties and liabilities.

(a)

If the Commissioner determines that the title insurer or any other person has violated this chapter, or any rule or order promulgated under this chapter, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the Commissioner may order:

(1)

A penalty not exceeding $2,500 for the 1st violation;

(2)

A penalty not exceeding $5,000 for each successive violation; and

(3)

Revocation or suspension of the title insurer’s license.

(b)

This section shall affect the right of the Commissioner to impose any other penalties provided for in any acts relating to insurance which are codified in this title.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2162, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2162 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).